Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7500 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Anesthesia time” means the period beginning when an
anesthesia practitioner begins to prepare the patient for anesthesia
services in the operating room or an equivalent area and ends when
the anesthesia practitioner is no longer furnishing anesthesia
services to the patient. In counting anesthesia time for services
furnished, the anesthesia practitioner may include blocks of time
around an interruption in anesthesia time provided the anesthesia
practitioner is furnishing continuous anesthesia care within the
time periods around the interruption;
2. “Payments for anesthesia service” means the prevailing
medical coding and billing standards in the professional medical
billing community including, but not limited to, current AMA CPT
Codebook, Medicare Claims Processing Manual, and American Society of

Anesthesiologists guidance. Payment for anesthesia services is
based on base plus time unit together multiplied by an anesthesia
conversion factor. Anesthesia time units are recognized in
appropriate time intervals that must add up to the duration of the
anesthesia time; and
3. “Insurer” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section
1250.2 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. No insurer shall establish, implement, or enforce any
policy, practice, or procedure which:
1. Imposes a time limit on the amount of covered anesthesia
services provided during a medical or surgical procedure; or
2. Restricts or excludes coverage or payment of anesthesia
time.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1019 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1019 Page 3